Utah statutes.
72-5-104.   Public use constituting dedication -- Scope.
(1)  A highway is dedicated and abandoned to the use of the public when it has
been continuously used as a public thoroughfare for a period of ten years.
(2)  The dedication and abandonment creates a right-of-way held by the state
in accordance with Sections 72-3-102, 72-3-104, 72-3-105, and 72-5-103.
(3)  The scope of the right-of-way is that which is reasonable and necessary
to ensure safe travel according to the facts and circumstances.
